Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.073, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given deleted text begin themdeleted text end . (b) "Electronic visit verification" means the electronic documentation of the: (1) type of service performed; (2) new text begin full name of the new text end individual receiving the service; (3) date of the service; (4) location of the service delivery; deleted text begin (5) individual providing the service; and deleted text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end time the service begins and endsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (6) full name, unique provider identifier, if any, and title, if any, of the individual providing the service or, if the service is provided by multiple individuals, full name, unique provider identifier, if any, and title, if any, of the individual to whom the employer has delegated responsibility for verifying services; new text end new text begin (7) signature of the individual under clause (6) acknowledging that providing false information on an electronic visit verification is a federal crime and that by signing the electronic visit verification the signatory is attesting to the accuracy of the information contained on the electronic visit verification; and new text end new text begin (8) method by which the service recipient, the service recipient's legal guardian or conservator, or the service recipient's parent, if the service recipient is a minor, attests to the accuracy of the information contained on the electronic visit verification. new text end (c) "Electronic visit verification system" means a system that provides electronic verification of services that complies with the 21st Century Cures Act, Public Law 114-255, and the requirements of subdivision 3. (d) "Service" means one of the following: (1) personal care assistance services as defined in section 256B.0625, subdivision 19a, and provided according to section 256B.0659; (2) community first services and supports under section 256B.85; (3) home health services under section 256B.0625, subdivision 6a; deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin (4) services of provider types designated high-risk by the commissioner under section 256B.04, subdivision 21; new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end other medical supplies and equipment or home and community-based services that are required to be electronically verified by the 21st Century Cures Act, Public Law 114-255deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (6) any other program or service designated by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DIRECTION TO THE COMMISSIONER OF HUMAN SERVICES; METHOD OF VISIT VERIFICATION.new text end new text begin The commissioner must develop methods for collecting signatures required under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.073, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), clause (8), of the service recipient, the service recipient's legal guardian or conservator, or the service recipient's parent, if the service recipient is a minor, on a statement acknowledging that providing false information on an electronic visit verification is a federal crime and attesting to the accuracy of the information contained on an electronic visit verification. The methods may differ to meet the needs of the service recipient, the service recipient's legal guardian or conservator, or the service recipient's parent, if the service recipient is a minor. new text end